Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2265.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 8-DONSITE EMERGENCY PHYSICIANSSection 801-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718192021 "Board-certified emergency physician." A physician licensed under the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, or the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, who is certified in the specialty of emergency medicine by a board recognized by the American Board of Medical Specialties or the American Osteopathic Association."Board-eligible emergency physician." A physician who:(1) is licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 1985 or the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;(2) has completed a residency in emergency medicine accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American Osteopathic Association; and(3) remains within the eligibility period to sit for initial board certification in emergency medicine as established by the relevant certifying board."Emergency department." The designated area of a hospital where health care services are furnished to evaluate, treat and stabilize a condition manifesting by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe pain, such that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in placing the individual's health, or the health of an unborn child, in serious jeopardy, serious impairment to bodily functions or serious dysfunction of any bodily organ."Hospital." A health care facility that is primarily engaged in providing to inpatients, by or under supervision of physicians, diagnostic services and therapeutic services for medical diagnosis, treatment and care of individuals who are injured, disabled or sick or rehabilitation services for the 20260HB2265PN3090 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rehabilitation of individuals who are injured, disabled or sick."EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 2, 2016 (P.L.976, NO.122), KNOWN AS THE SAFE EMERGENCY PRESCRIBING ACT."EMERGENCY PHYSICIAN." A PHYSICIAN WHO HAS COMPLETED POSTGRADUATE TRAINING IN EMERGENCY MEDICINE, INCLUDING PEDIATRIC EMERGENCY MEDICINE, OR WHO POSSESSES QUALIFICATIONS, TRAINING OR EXPERIENCE IN EMERGENCY MEDICINE, INCLUDING PEDIATRIC EMERGENCY MEDICINE, AS DETERMINED APPROPRIATE BY A HOSPITAL'S MEDICAL STAFF AND GOVERNING BODY."HOSPITAL." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 802.1."Onsite." In relation to services, that the services are:(1) being provided to a patient who is physically present in an emergency department; and(2) immediately available to the individual being supervised and with continued involvement in appropriate components of care."Physician." A medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy. EITHER:(1) AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF OCTOBER 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, NO.261), KNOWN AS THE OSTEOPATHIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT; OR(2) AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 20, 1985 (P.L.457, NO.112), KNOWN AS THE MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF 1985.Section 802-D. Requirement for onsite emergency physician.Unless an exception has been approved under section 803-D, a hospital with an emergency department shall ensure that a board- certified AN emergency physician or board-eligible emergency physician is onsite, on duty and primarily responsible for the 20260HB2265PN3090 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 emergency department at all times when the emergency department is open.Section 803-D. Exception.(a) Power of department.--The department may grant an exception to the requirements of section 802-D if a hospital is located in an area not designated as an urbanized area by the United States Census Bureau, including an area designated as an urban cluster, and satisfies the eligibility conditions in subsection (b).(A) POWER OF DEPARTMENT.--(1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY GRANT AN EXCEPTION TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 802-D IF A HOSPITAL SATISFIES THE ELIGIBILITY CONDITIONS IN SUBSECTION (B).(2) AN EXCEPTION GRANTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PERMIT A HOSPITAL TO STAFF ITS EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT WITH A PHYSICIAN WHO IS ONSITE AND ON DUTY AT ALL TIMES THE EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT IS OPEN, REGARDLESS OF THE PHYSICIAN'S QUALIFICATIONS, TRAINING OR EXPERIENCE IN EMERGENCY MEDICINE.(b) Eligibility.--To qualify for the exception under subsection (a), a hospital must demonstrate to the department the following conditions:(1) The hospital has an average daily emergency department census of 46 or less visits over the preceding two years.(2) Documented good faith efforts to recruit and retain board-certified emergency physicians or board-eligible emergency physicians.(3) Any other condition determined by the department that is necessary to protect patient safety, including:(i) Written policies for transfer of patients 20260HB2265PN3090 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requiring care beyond the capabilities of the hospital.(ii) Maintenance of transfer agreements consistent with 42 U.S.C. § 1395dd (relating to examination and treatment for emergency medical conditions and women in labor).(c) Process for review of exceptions.--The department shall process an exception under subsection (a) in accordance with 28 Pa. Code §§ 51.31 (relating to principle), 51.32 (relating to exceptions for innovative programs), 51.33 (relating to requests for exceptions) and 51.34 (relating to revocation of exceptions). AND DOCUMENT TO THE DEPARTMENT GOOD FAITH EFFORTS TO RECRUIT AND RETAIN EMERGENCY PHYSICIANS.Section 804-D. Construction.Nothing (A) TELE-EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT MODEL.--EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B), NOTHING in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the use of a tele-emergency department model in lieu of the requirement for an onsite physician under section 802-D.(B) PRIOR EXCEPTIONS.--AN EXCEPTION THAT HAS BEEN GRANTED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR USE OF A TELE-EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT MODEL OR USE OF ONSITE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONERS, OTHER THAN PHYSICIANS IN AN EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, SHALL REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT UNTIL RESCINDED BY THE DEPARTMENT.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2265PN3090 - 5 - <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425